North Carolina, session 2025, HB1242.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article I, Section 19, of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 19. Law of the land; equal protection of the laws.
No person shall be taken, imprisoned, or disseized of his freehold, liberties, or privileges, or
outlawed, or exiled, or in any manner deprived of his life, liberty, or property, but by the law of
the land. No person shall be denied the equal protection of the laws; nor shall any person be
subjected to discrimination by the State because of race, color, religion, or national origin."
SECTION 1.(b) The amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3,
2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that
time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to modernize the language of the law of the land clause in
Article I, Section 19, of the North Carolina Constitution."
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under Section 1(b) of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question
are in favor of the amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll
the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are against the amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act, the amendment shall have
no effect.
SECTION 1.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section
1(c) of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 1(a) of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act is effective
upon certification.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1242-v-1*